California statutes. Labor Code
Pursuant to Section 16370 of the Government Code, there is hereby authorized in the State Treasury a Special Deposit Fund Account, which shall consist of moneys collected from the sale of instructional material to persons enrolled in any apprenticeship training program under this chapter. All of the moneys collected are hereby appropriated without regard to fiscal year for the support of the Department of Education to be used for the development and production of apprenticeship instructional material.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1546, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

3092.

A successful graduate of a training program in a particular apprenticeable occupation of a vocational education program meeting the standards of the California State Plan for Vocational Education may receive credit toward a term of apprenticeship if the program is jointly established and approved by a school district, a county superintendent of schools, a public entity conducting a regional occupational center or program, or a private postsecondary vocational school accredited by a regional or national accrediting agency recognized by the United States Office of Education and the program sponsor of the particular apprenticeable occupation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 330, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Other On-The-Job Training Programs [3093. - 3093.]

3093.

(a) This section applies only when voluntarily requested by the parties to a collective bargaining agreement or by an employer, an employer’s association, or a union, or its representative where there is no collective bargaining agreement.

(b) This section shall not be construed to compel, regulate, interfere with, or duplicate the provisions of any established training programs that are operated under the terms of any collective bargaining agreements or unilaterally by any employer or bona fide labor union.

(c) Services contemplated under this section may be provided only when voluntarily requested and shall be denied when it is found that existing prevailing conditions in the area and industry
 would in any way be lowered or adversely affected.

(d) The California Apprenticeship Council and the Division of Apprenticeship Standards, in cooperation with the Department of Education, the Labor and Workforce Development Agency, and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, may foster and promote on-the-job training programs other than apprenticeship as follows: (1) programs for journeypersons in the apprenticeable occupations to keep them abreast of current techniques, methods, and materials and opportunities for advancement in their industries; (2) programs in other than apprenticeable occupations for workers entering the labor market for the first time or workers entering new occupations by reason of having been displaced from former occupations by reason of economic, industrial, technological, or scientific changes or developments; (3) the programs shall be in accord with and agreed to by the parties to any applicable collective bargaining agreements and where appropriate will include joint employer-employee cooperation in the programs.

(e) The Division of Apprenticeship Standards when requested may foster and promote voluntary on-the-job
 training programs in accordance with this section, and assist employers, employees and other interested persons and agencies in the development and carrying out of the programs. The Division of Apprenticeship Standards shall cooperate in these functions with the Department of Education, the Labor and Workforce Development Agency, and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges and other governmental agencies. The Division of Apprenticeship Standards may cooperate with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the Department of the Youth Authority in the development of training programs for inmates and ex-offenders released from correctional institutions.

(f) Apprenticeship programs, where appropriate, may include related and supplemental classroom instruction offered and administered by state and local boards responsible for vocational education.

(g) The
 activities and services of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards in training programs under this section shall be performed without curtailing or in any way interfering with the division’s activities and services in apprenticeship.

(h) The Division of Apprenticeship Standards may contract with, and receive reimbursements from, appropriate federal, state, and other governmental agencies.

(i) The career technical education activities and services of the Department of Education, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, and local public school districts shall not be abridged or abrogated through implementation of this section.

(j) “On-the-job training” as used in this section refers exclusively to training confined to the needs of a specific occupation and conducted at the jobsite for employed
 workers.

(k) “Journeyperson,” as used in this section, means a person who has either (1) completed an accredited apprenticeship in the person’s craft, or (2) who has completed the equivalent of an apprenticeship in length and content of work experience and all other requirements in the apprenticeship standards for the craft which has workers classified as journeypersons in an apprenticeable occupation.

(l) This section shall not be construed to require prior approval, ratification, or reference of any training program to the Division of Apprenticeship Standards or the Department of Industrial Relations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 16.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Preapprenticeship Programs [3100. - 3100.]

3100.

(a) On or before January 1, 2019, the Division of Apprenticeship Standards shall develop a process to approve preapprenticeship programs for purposes of establishing eligibility for any state programs.

(b) (1) A program seeking approval as a preapprenticeship program shall submit to the Division of Apprenticeship Standards a request for approval, on a form developed by the division.

(2) The request for approval shall include documentation evidencing that the program’s preapprenticeship training activities are conducted in partnership with one or more apprenticeship programs approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards. Valid documentation for purposes of this section shall
 include a copy of a memorandum of understanding or other formal written agreement that does all the following:

(A) Verifies the apprenticeship program’s support for the preapprenticeship program.

(B) Gives priority but not a guarantee to preapprenticeship graduates for acceptance into the apprenticeship program.

(C) Makes a commitment as to the number of preapprenticeship graduates that may be accepted into the apprenticeship program.

(c) To qualify for approval, a preapprenticeship program shall include the following elements:

(1) Training and curriculum based on industry standards and approved by the documented registered apprenticeship program partner or partners that will prepare
 individuals with the skills and competencies needed to enter one or more registered apprenticeship programs.

(2) Strategies that increase registered apprenticeship opportunities for underrepresented, disadvantaged, or low-skilled individuals, such that, upon completion, those individuals will meet the entry requirements, gain consideration, and be prepared for success in one or more registered apprenticeship programs. These strategies include any of the following:

(A) Strong recruitment efforts focused on outreach to populations underrepresented in local, state, and national registered apprenticeship programs.

(B) Educational and prevocational services that prepare individuals to meet the entry requisites of one or more registered apprenticeship programs, such as specific career and industry awareness workshops, job
 readiness courses, English for speakers of other languages, adult basic education, financial literacy seminars, and mathematics tutoring.

(C) Exposing participants to local, state, and national registered apprenticeship programs and providing direct assistance to participants applying to those programs.

(D) Facilitating access to appropriate support services during both the preapprenticeship program and a significant portion of the registered apprenticeship program.

(E) Efforts to sustain the ongoing partnership between the preapprenticeship program and registered apprenticeship program partner or partners, including collaborative efforts that promote alignment with the California Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (WIOA) Unified Strategic Workforce Development Plan and use of the registered apprenticeship
 program as a preferred means for employers to develop a skilled workforce and create career opportunities for individuals.

(F) Providing physical preparedness training for jobs where physical ability and endurance are key elements of success.

(G) Providing training on safe working practices where applicable to the job.

(H) Providing hands-on training to individuals in a simulated lab experience or through volunteer opportunities that accurately simulate industry and occupational conditions while observing proper supervision and safety protocols, provided that such experience and opportunities do not supplant or reduce the compensable work of paid employees.

(I) Providing for automatic acceptance or priority credits for acceptance into apprenticeship
 programs of individuals who have successfully completed the preapprenticeship program, and when applicable, giving advance credit in the apprenticeship program for skills and competencies already acquired in the preapprenticeship program.

(d) Preapprenticeship programs shall be evaluated and approved based on a determination of the strengths of the elements described in subdivision (c), as demonstrated in the application.

(e) Approval of a preapprenticeship program shall expire in three years unless the program requests and obtains renewal of its approval by the division. Renewed approval shall be based on the program’s success in implementing the elements described in subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 187.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Apprenticeship Innovation Funding Program [3110. - 3112.1.]

3110.

(a) The provisions of this article shall be operative and implemented only upon appropriation of sufficient funds by the Legislature for that purpose. This article applies only to programs that are not within the jurisdiction of the council established pursuant to Section 3070.

(b) The division shall establish and administer the Apprenticeship Innovation Funding Program to provide grants, reimbursements, or funding through other appropriate funding mechanisms to an apprenticeship program for the support of apprenticeship programs or for the training of apprentices. Grants, reimbursements, or funding from other appropriate funding mechanisms pursuant to the Apprenticeship Innovation Funding Program shall be awarded using funding appropriated
 by the Legislature for this purpose.

(c) An apprenticeship program or eligible entity may submit an application to the division to request funds under this article in a manner specified by the division. An “eligible entity” is an entity that has registered apprentices with the division, including, but not limited to, public educational institutions, public and private nonprofit organizations, local workforce development boards specified in Section 14200 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, labor organizations, as defined in Section 1117, private for-profit organizations, education and training providers, tribal organizations, faith-based organizations, community-based organizations, industry associations, and parties to a collective bargaining agreement.

(d) Funding provided to the entities in subdivision (c) can be passed on to whichever entity is performing eligible activities
 pursuant to the funding that are consistent with this article, including the eligible activities described in Sections 3111.1 and 3112.1, provided that the entities are associated with an approved apprenticeship program.

(e) Any entity receiving funding pursuant to this article is subject to evaluation by the division under Section 3073.1. If the entity is found to have violated the provisions of this chapter, those violations are deemed imputed to the associated apprenticeship program, and the division may take any appropriate action against that apprenticeship program.

(f) As used in this article, “public educational institutions” includes local educational agencies, community colleges, the University of California, and the California State University.

(g) If a program or other entity is found to be using
 apprenticeship innovation funding for purposes other than those for which the funds were granted or is found to have obtained the funds improperly, then the program or other entity shall not be eligible to receive any apprenticeship innovation funding and the division or entity authorized to provide funding shall cease providing funds.

(h) The division shall require that recipients of apprenticeship innovation funding demonstrate a commitment to high road principles, as described in subdivision (s) of Section 14005 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, and shall evaluate the performance of recipients based on those principles.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 17.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3111.

(a) The division may provide apprenticeship innovation funding support funds for the organizing, running, and sustaining of, an apprenticeship program that is not within the jurisdiction of the council established pursuant to Section 3070. To be eligible for support funds, an apprenticeship program or eligible entity must submit to the division an application to request funds.

(b) For each apprentice that is actively registered with the division for each 12-month period, an apprenticeship program or eligible entity is eligible to receive support funds in an amount determined by the division. In determining the amount, the division shall aim to provide support funds to as many eligible programs as possible and shall consider the amount of available support funds, the
 number of approved programs not within the jurisdiction of the council established pursuant to Section 3070, and the number of apprentices registered in those programs.

(c) The eligible amount in subdivision (b) shall be prorated on a monthly basis for apprentices who are actively registered for less than the 12-month period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 569, Sec. 45.   (AB 156)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3111.1.

Eligible activities for support funds shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Employer outreach, support, onboarding, and management.

(b) Recruiting, matching, and placing individuals into apprenticeships.

(c) Support services for an apprentice, such as interview coaching, conflict resolution, and life crisis management.

(d) Retention initiatives to reduce the turnover rate of apprentices.

(e) Tracking and reporting the apprentices to the division.

(f) Troubleshooting and adjudicating stakeholders in a joint apprenticeship committee, a unilateral management apprenticeship committee, or a unilateral labor apprenticeship committee.

(g) Project management and stakeholder management.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 569, Sec. 46.   (AB 156)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3112.

(a) The division may provide apprenticeship innovation funding training funds either directly to public educational institutions for the training of apprentices, provided that an apprenticeship program is providing the training pursuant to a contract with the public educational institution, or to apprenticeship programs. The funds shall be provided for each apprentice training hour at the rate described in subdivision (c).

(b) If apprentice training costs are already being reimbursed pursuant to Section 8152, 79149.1, or 79149.3 of the Education Code, then those training costs shall be ineligible for reimbursement under this section.

(c) The reimbursement rate for training reimbursed pursuant to this
 section shall be equivalent to the reimbursement rate established under Sections 8152 and 79149.3 of the Education Code.

(d) Reimbursements may be made under this section for training provided to registered apprentices only if all of the following are true:

(1) The training is provided by an approved program that is not within the jurisdiction of the council established pursuant to Section 3070.

(2) The program is providing the training pursuant to a contract with a public educational institution.

(3) An application for funding is submitted to the division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 569, Sec. 47.   (AB 156)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3112.1.

Eligible activities for apprenticeship innovation funding training funds shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Development of courses.

(b) Classroom instruction.

(c) Equipment specifically for classroom training.

(d) Instructor salaries.

(e) Curriculum design.

(f) Administration of transitioning courses to for-credit college course.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 17.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Youth Apprenticeship [3120. - 3122.4.]

3120.

Youth apprenticeship shall be a key priority for the Division of Apprenticeship Standards. Youth apprenticeship will complement the state’s existing registered apprenticeship and preapprenticeship programs. The goals and objectives of the division in expanding youth apprenticeships shall include all of the following:

(a) Create a framework for youth apprenticeship, increase the number of apprenticeship pathways for youth, and foster coordination and alignment across career-connected learning programs.

(b) Increase the number of community colleges and local education agencies offering youth apprenticeship programs, and increase the number of youth who complete certificate and degree programs.

(c) Increase the number of preapprenticeship and apprenticeship programs targeting youth.

(d) Increase the number of youth who complete a youth apprenticeship and matriculate to employment or continued higher education.

(e) Coordinate with, complement, and enhance, existing preapprenticeship and apprenticeship programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 18.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3121.

(a) The Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards shall convene a committee to develop recommendations to the division on the expansion of youth apprenticeships in California.

(b) The committee shall include representatives from youth, youth serving organizations, labor, employers of youth, K–12 schools, community colleges, and the public workforce system.

(c) In developing these recommendations, the committee shall specifically address the following topics:

(1) Clear definitions of youth apprenticeship and high school apprenticeships.

(2) Guiding principles in the Youth Apprenticeship Grant Program administered by the division pursuant to Section 3122.

(3) Insights on the structure of the state’s work to expand youth apprenticeship.

(d) The committee shall provide a report to the division with a set of recommendations no later than July 1, 2024.

(e) The Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards shall provide the report to the corresponding fiscal and policy committees of each house of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 18.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3122.

(a) The Youth Apprenticeship Grant Program is hereby established, to be administered by the division, for the purposes of awarding grant funds to eligible applicants to provide funding for existing apprenticeship and preapprenticeship programs or to develop new apprenticeship and preapprenticeship programs to serve the target population and satisfy the goals and objectives of the grant program as specified in this article. The grant program does not apply to building and construction trades programs that are within the jurisdiction of the council established pursuant to Section 3070.

(b) Under the grant program, services shall be delivered principally through collaborative, mission-driven, community-based organizations with experience in
 providing services to, and with relevant relationships with, targeted populations, consistent with the objectives of the grant program.

(c) The division shall consult with and seek feedback from state agencies during the planning process to ensure grant funds awarded under the program leverage and complement existing grant programs.

(d) The division shall solicit proposals and select grant recipients from eligible applicants, including local educational agencies, county offices of education, regional consortia of community college districts, local intermediaries, regional and local workforce development boards, apprenticeship program sponsors, and organizations who contract with employers, local educational agencies, community-based organizations, labor, and other workforce development stakeholders.

(e) The division
 shall require that grant recipients demonstrate a commitment to high road principles, as described in subdivision (r) of Section 14005 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, and shall evaluate the performance of recipients based on those principles.

(f) The division shall complete the planning process to implement the program by October 31, 2023, and shall begin soliciting grant proposals no later than March 31, 2024.

(g) As used in this section, “target population” includes individuals from 16 to 24 years of age who are at risk of disconnection or are disconnected from the education system or employment, unhoused, in the child welfare, juvenile justice, or criminal legal systems, living in concentrated poverty, or are facing barriers to labor market participation. “Target population” includes youth who face chronic opportunity educational achievement gaps, attend schools in
 communities of concentrated poverty, or attend high schools with a negative school climate indicated by factors, including, but not limited to:

(1) School attendance rates.

(2) Chronic absenteeism and truancy rates.

(3) Dropout rates and low graduation rates.

(4) Proficiency scores in English language arts and mathematics.

(5) Pupil suspension and expulsion rates.

(h) The provisions of this section shall be implemented only upon appropriation of sufficient funds by the Legislature for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 18.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3122.1.

Grant funds may be used for eligible purposes that include, but are not limited to:

(a) Instruction and training of apprentices and preapprentices.

(b) Costs related to registration, design, and setting up the apprenticeship or preapprenticeship program or curriculum.

(c) Project and case management.

(d) Related instruction costs.

(e) Education or training equipment, uniforms, tools, graduation fees, and union fees.

(f) Mental health
 services, trauma-informed care, and wraparound support services, including child or dependent care.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 18.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3122.2.

The grant proposal shall include, but is not limited to, the following information:

(a) Knowledge, experience, and capacity to provide services to the target population.

(b) Industries and career pathways targeted.

(c) Target population that will be served. “Target population” includes individuals from 16 to 24 years of age who are facing educational achievement gaps, attending schools in communities of concentrated poverty, or attending high schools with a negative school climate, as specified in subdivision (g) of Section 3122, as well as youth who are at risk of disconnection or are disconnected from the education system or
 employment, unhoused, in the child welfare, juvenile justice, or criminal legal systems, living in concentrated poverty, or are facing barriers to labor market participation.

(d) How project goals and objectives will be achieved.

(e) Other requirements as specified by the division.

(f) If the proposal requests funds for a firefighter apprenticeship program, the proposal shall meet the conditions specified in subdivision (b) of Section 3075.

(g) If the proposal requests funds for a firefighter preapprenticeship program, the proposal shall be approved by the California Apprenticeship Council.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 18.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3122.3.

The Youth Apprenticeship Grant Program shall have an explicit focus on equity and aims to ensure that race, income, geography, gender, citizenship status, ability, and other demographics and student characteristics no longer predict the outcomes of California’s youth. To measure success towards that goal, the grant program shall do both of the following:

(a) Require grant recipients to collect, analyze, and report program data on race, gender, income, rurality, ability, foster youth, homeless youth, English language learner, and other key characteristics.

(b) Cross-tabulate demographic data with labor force participation data and enrollment data among the various demographic groups named above to assess parity in relation to the public K–12 high school, community college, and four-year university graduating cohort demographic distribution, comparing program completion rates with the attainment of educational degrees across groups.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 569, Sec. 48.   (AB 156)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3122.4.

(a) The division shall monitor and audit grant recipients to ensure compliance with policies, procedures, and requirements for use of the grant funds. Grant recipients shall provide necessary data to the division for purposes of evaluating achievement of the goals and objectives of the grant program.

(b) Any grant recipient receiving funding pursuant to this article is subject to evaluation by the division under Section 3073.1. If the grant recipient is found to have violated the provisions of this chapter, those violations are deemed imputed to the associated apprenticeship program, and the division may take any appropriate action against that apprenticeship program.

(c) If
 a program, the grant recipient, or other entity is found to be using Youth Apprenticeship Grant Program funds for purposes other than those for which the funds were granted or is found to have obtained the funds improperly, then the program, grant recipient, or other entity shall not be eligible to receive any grant program funds, and the division or entity authorized to provide funding shall cease providing funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 18.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4. WORKERS' COMPENSATION AND INSURANCE [3200. - 6002.]



PART 1. SCOPE AND OPERATION [3200. - 4418.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [3200. - 3219.]

3200.

The Legislature hereby declares its intent that the term “workmen’s compensation” shall hereafter also be known as “workers’ compensation, ” and that the “Workmen’s Compensation Appeals Board” shall hereafter be known as the “Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board.” In furtherance of this policy it is the desire of the Legislature that references to the terms “workmen’s compensation” and “Workmen’s Compensation Appeals Board” in this code or elsewhere be changed to “workers’ compensation” and “Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board” when such laws are being amended for any purpose. This act is declaratory and not amendatory of existing
 law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 21, Sec. 5.   Effective April 18, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

3201.

This division and Division 5 (commencing with Section 6300) are an expression of the police power and are intended to make effective and apply to a complete system of workers’ compensation the provisions of Section 4 of Article XIV of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 248, Sec. 157.)
-------------------------------------------

3201.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the Department of Industrial Relations and the courts of this state shall recognize as valid and binding any provision in a collective bargaining agreement between a private employer or groups of employers engaged in construction, construction maintenance, or activities limited to rock, sand, gravel, cement and asphalt operations, heavy-duty mechanics, surveying, and construction inspection and a union that is the recognized or certified exclusive bargaining representative that establishes any of the following:

(1) An alternative dispute resolution system governing disputes between employees and employers or their insurers that supplements or replaces all or part of those
 dispute resolution processes contained in this division, including, but not limited to, mediation and arbitration. Any system of arbitration shall provide that the decision of the arbiter or board of arbitration is subject to review by the appeals board in the same manner as provided for reconsideration of a final order, decision, or award made and filed by a workers’ compensation administrative law judge pursuant to the procedures set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 5900) of Chapter 7 of Part 4 of Division 4, and the court of appeals pursuant to the procedures set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 5950) of Chapter 7 of Part 4 of Division 4, governing orders, decisions, or awards of the appeals board. The findings of fact, award, order, or decision of the arbitrator shall have the same force and effect as an award, order, or decision of a workers’ compensation administrative law judge. Any provision for arbitration established pursuant to this section shall not be subject to Sections
 5270, 5270.5, 5271, 5272, 5273, 5275, and 5277.

(2) The use of an agreed list of providers of medical treatment that may be the exclusive source of all medical treatment provided under this division.

(3) The use of an agreed, limited list of qualified medical evaluators and agreed medical evaluators that may be the exclusive source of qualified medical evaluators and agreed medical evaluators under this division.

(4) Joint labor management safety committees.

(5) A light-duty, modified job or return-to-work program.

(6) A vocational rehabilitation or retraining program utilizing an agreed list of providers of rehabilitation services that may be the exclusive source of providers of
 rehabilitation services under this division.

(b) (1) Nothing in this section shall allow a collective bargaining agreement that diminishes the entitlement of an employee to compensation payments for total or partial disability, temporary disability, vocational rehabilitation, or medical treatment fully paid by the employer as otherwise provided in this division. The portion of any agreement that violates this paragraph shall be declared null and void.

(2) The parties may negotiate any aspect of the delivery of medical benefits and the delivery of disability compensation to employees of the employer or group of employers that are eligible for group health benefits and nonoccupational disability benefits through their employer.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall apply only to the following:

(1) An employer developing or projecting an annual workers’ compensation insurance premium, in California, of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or more, or any employer that paid an annual workers’ compensation insurance premium, in California, of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in at least one of the previous three years.

(2) Groups of employers engaged in a workers’ compensation safety group complying with Sections 11656.6 and 11656.7 of the Insurance Code, and established pursuant to a joint labor management safety committee or committees, that develops or projects annual workers’ compensation insurance premiums of two million dollars ($2,000,000) or more.

(3) Employers or groups of employers that are self-insured in compliance with Section 3700 that would have projected annual workers’
 compensation costs that meet the requirements of, and that meet the other requirements of, paragraph (1) in the case of employers, or paragraph (2) in the case of groups of employers.

(4) Employers covered by an owner or general contractor provided wrap-up insurance policy applicable to a single construction site that develops workers’ compensation insurance premiums of two million dollars ($2,000,000) or more with respect to those employees covered by that wrap-up insurance policy.

(d) Employers and labor representatives who meet the eligibility requirements of this section shall be issued a letter by the administrative director advising each employer and labor representative that, based upon the review of all documents and materials submitted as required by the administrative director, each has met the eligibility requirements of this section.

(e) The premium rate for a policy of insurance issued pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the requirements of Section 11732 or 11732.5 of the Insurance Code.

(f) No employer may establish or continue a program established under this section until it has provided the administrative director with all of the following:

(1) Upon its original application and whenever it is renegotiated thereafter, a copy of the collective bargaining agreement and the approximate number of employees who will be covered thereby.

(2) Upon its original application and annually thereafter, a valid and active license where that license is required by law as a condition of doing business in the state within the industries set forth in subdivision (a) of Section
 3201.5.

(3) Upon its original application and annually thereafter, a statement signed under penalty of perjury, that no action has been taken by any administrative agency or court of the United States to invalidate the collective bargaining agreement.

(4) The name, address, and telephone number of the contact person of the employer.

(5) Any other information that the administrative director deems necessary to further the purposes of this section.

(g) No collective bargaining representative may establish or continue to participate in a program established under this section unless all of the following requirements are met:

(1) Upon its original application and annually thereafter, it has
 provided to the administrative director a copy of its most recent LM-2 or LM-3 filing with the United States Department of Labor, along with a statement, signed under penalty of perjury, that the document is a true and correct copy.

(2) It has provided to the administrative director the name, address, and telephone number of the contact person or persons of the collective bargaining representative or representatives.

(h) Commencing July 1, 1995, and annually thereafter, the Division of Workers’ Compensation shall report to the Director of Industrial Relations the number of collective bargaining agreements received and the number of employees covered by these agreements.

(i) The data obtained by the administrative director pursuant to this section shall be confidential and not subject to public disclosure under any
 law of this state. However, the Division of Workers’ Compensation shall create derivative works pursuant to subdivision (h) based on the collective bargaining agreements and data. Those derivative works shall not be confidential, but shall be public. On a monthly basis the administrative director shall make available an updated list of employers and unions entering into collective bargaining agreements containing provisions authorized by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 8.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3201.7.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the Department of Industrial Relations and the courts of this state shall recognize as valid and binding any labor-management agreement that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The labor-management agreement has been negotiated separate and apart from any collective bargaining agreement covering affected employees.

(2) The labor-management agreement is restricted to the establishment of the terms and conditions necessary to implement this section.

(3) The labor-management agreement has been negotiated in accordance with the authorization of the
 administrative director pursuant to subdivision (d), between an employer or groups of employers and a union that is the recognized or certified exclusive bargaining representative that establishes any of the following:

(A) An alternative dispute resolution system governing disputes between employees and employers or their insurers that supplements or replaces all or part of those dispute resolution processes contained in this division, including, but not limited to, mediation and arbitration. Any system of arbitration shall provide that the decision of the arbiter or board of arbitration is subject to review by the appeals board in the same manner as provided for reconsideration of a final order, decision, or award made and filed by a workers’ compensation administrative law judge pursuant to the procedures set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 5900) of Chapter 7 of Part 4 of Division 4, and the court of appeals pursuant to the
 procedures set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 5950) of Chapter 7 of Part 4 of Division 4, governing orders, decisions, or awards of the appeals board. The findings of fact, award, order, or decision of the arbitrator shall have the same force and effect as an award, order, or decision of a workers’ compensation administrative law judge. Any provision for arbitration established pursuant to this section shall not be subject to Sections 5270, 5270.5, 5271, 5272, 5273, 5275, and 5277.

(B) The use of an agreed list of providers of medical treatment that may be the exclusive source of all medical treatment provided under this division.

(C) The use of an agreed, limited list of qualified medical evaluators and agreed medical evaluators that may be the exclusive source of qualified medical evaluators and agreed medical evaluators under this division.

(D) Joint labor management safety committees.

(E) A light-duty, modified job, or return-to-work program.

(F) A vocational rehabilitation or retraining program utilizing an agreed list of providers of rehabilitation services that may be the exclusive source of providers of rehabilitation services under this division.
